Missouri, session 2026, HB3196.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 285, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 285.690, to read as follows:
285.690. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Child", a biological child, adopted child, foster child, or a child for whom
the employee stands in loco parentis, who is enrolled in a licensed daycare, early
childhood program, public school, or nonpublic school;
(2) "Employer", any individual, partnership, association, corporation, business,
or other entity employing ten or more employees within the state;
(3) "School-related activity", any conference, meeting, appointment,
disciplinary proceeding, academic support session, or event initiated by a child’s
school, daycare, or licensed childcare provider for the purpose of discussing the child’s
education, development, behavior, or well-being.
2. Each employer shall provide to every employee a minimum of two hours of
paid leave per calendar month, to be used exclusively for school-related activities
concerning the employee’s child. Paid leave under this section:
(1) Shall be paid at the employee’s regular rate of pay;
(2) Shall not be counted against sick leave, vacation leave, or any other accrued
leave;
(3) May be taken in increments as small as thirty minutes;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3196 2
(4) Shall not be carried over to subsequent months.
3. Employees shall provide the employer with reasonable advance notice of the
need to use leave under this section, unless the activity could not reasonably have been
anticipated. Employers may request written verification from the school or childcare
provider indicating that the employee attended a school-related activity on the date and
time claimed.
4. An employer shall not:
(1) Interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of rights provided under this
section; or
(2) Discharge, discipline, or otherwise retaliate against an employee for using or
attempting to use leave under this section.
5. The department of labor and industrial relations shall administer and enforce
this section. An employer who willfully violates this section may be subject to an
administrative penalty of not more than five hundred dollars for each violation.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish any right, privilege, or
benefit provided to an employee under any collective bargaining agreement, employer
policy, or other state or federal law.
7. The director of the department of labor and industrial relations may
promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date,
or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall
be invalid and void.
✔